Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB185.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of a WaterSense product or an Energy Star product, beg inning in 2025 an d each year thereafter, for the period beginning April 22 and ending April 29. For the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 purposes of this clause, the following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:(i) "Energy Star product" means a product meeting the energy efficiency requirements set forth in Energy Star product specifications established by the Environmental Protection Agency.(ii) "WaterSense product" means a water-efficient product that has been independently tested and certified to meet the Environmental Protection Agency's WaterSense criteria for efficiency and performance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0185PN0132 - 2 - 1234567891011